src/lexica/__backup__/pr.lexc
!!!pr.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols +Pr +Sg +Pl +1P +2P +3P

LEXICON Root
Pr;

LEXICON PrInf
+Pr:0 #;

LEXICON Pr1sg
+Pr+1P+Sg:0 #;

LEXICON Pr2sg
+Pr+2P+Sg:0 #;

LEXICON Pr3sg
+Pr+3P+Sg:0 #;

LEXICON Pr1pl
+Pr+1P+Pl:0 #;

LEXICON Pr2pl
+Pr+2P+Pl:0 #;

LEXICON Pr3pl
+Pr+3P+Pl:0 #;

LEXICON Pr
!Subject Pronouns
من Pr1sg;
تو Pr2sg;
او Pr3sg;
ما Pr1pl;
شما Pr2pl;
آنها Pr3pl;
!Lexical items from corpus
خود	PrInf;
من	PrInf;
همین	PrInf;
آنها	PrInf;
تان	PrInf;
اینان	PrInf;
شان	PrInf;
کو	PrInf;
همانها	PrInf;
هیچ	PrInf;
ما	PrInf;
آن	PrInf;
این	PrInf;
شما	PrInf;
همدیگر	PrInf;
ام	PrInf;
ت	PrInf;
چی	PrInf;
همانها	PrInf;
آن‌ها	PrInf;
آنها	PrInf;
کدام	PrInf;
ش	PrInf;
م	PrInf;
تو	PrInf;
خودمان	PrInf;
ما	PrInf;
آن	PrInf;
این	PrInf;
من	PrInf;
مان	PrInf;
چه	PrInf;
همین	PrInf;
آن‌ها	PrInf;
خویش	PrInf;
خودش	PrInf;
آنجا	PrInf;
آنان	PrInf;
چنین	PrInf;
ماها	PrInf;
خودشان	PrInf;
دیگران	PrInf;
چقدر	PrInf;
خود	PrInf;
کس	PrInf;
#هست	PrInf;
کرد#کن	PrInf;
کجا	PrInf;
اینجانب	PrInf;
او	PrInf;
آ‌نها	PrInf;
همان	PrInf;
همدیگر	PrInf;
آن	PrInf;
یکدیگر	PrInf;
شما	PrInf;
ش	PrInf;
ت	PrInf;
کی	PrInf;
این‌ها	PrInf;
اینها	PrInf;
که	PrInf;
آنها	PrInf;
خودم	PrInf;
آ‌ها	PrInf;
م	PrInf;
بنده	PrInf;
اش	PrInf;
ﺧﻮد	PrInf;
آنچه	PrInf;
همینان	PrInf;
این	PrInf;
من	PrInf;
خودت	PrInf;
دیگری	PrInf;
خودتان	PrInf;
ایشان	PrInf;
آنچنان	PrInf;
همه	PrInf;
تو	PrInf;
چنان	PrInf;
وی	PrInf;
هم	PrInf;
خویشتن	PrInf;
این‌جانب	PrInf;
بعضی	PrInf;
